Utah statutes.
64-13e-106.   Report to Legislature.

Before November 1 of each year, the department shall provide to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee of the Legislature a written report regarding housing of state inmates, state parole inmates, and state probationary inmates under this chapter, including:

(1)  the final state daily incarceration rate established under this chapter;

(2)  the rates described in Subsections 64-13e-103(3) and 64-13e-104(2);

(3)  participating counties;

(4)  the number of state inmates housed by each county;

(5)  the number of state parole inmates housed by each county; and

(6)  the number of state probationary inmates housed by each county.



Amended by Chapter 51, 2011 General Session

